test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-yolytseTS_gt-norm.yaml
     ёльцьʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [ёльцяндонзь, ёльцьндонзь]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюн
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюд
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюниʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюнаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюнась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюнинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюнаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ёльцьӈгаюдонзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцен
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцед
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцеда
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцениʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцедиʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльценаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцедаˮ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ёльцедоʼ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльценась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцедась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцедась
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльценинзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцединзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцединзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльценаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцедаць
     ёльцьʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ёльцедонзь
     ёльцьʼ+N+Tra: ёльцьӈэ
     ёльцьʼ+N+Car: [ёльцянзиˮ, ёльцьнзиˮ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Equ: [ёльцяндаремʼ, ёльцьндаремʼ]
     ёльцьʼ+N+Equ+Lat: [ёльцяндаревʼ, ёльцьндаревʼ]
